Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.520

Security force—Authorized.

An operating agency constructing or operating a nuclear power plant under a site certificate issued under chapter 80.50 RCW may establish a security force for the protection and security of each nuclear power plant site exclusion area. Members of the security force may be supplied with uniforms and badges indicating their position as security force members if the uniforms and badges do not closely resemble the uniforms or badges of any law enforcement agency or other agency possessing law enforcement powers in the surrounding area of the nuclear power plant exclusion area. Members of the security force shall enroll in and successfully complete a training program approved by the criminal justice training commission which does not conflict with any requirements of the United States nuclear regulatory commission for the training of security personnel at nuclear power plants. All costs incurred by the criminal justice training commission in the preparation, delivery, or certification of the training programs shall be paid by the operating agency.

[ 1981 c 301 s 1.]